Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1233.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 27 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 67PORTABLE BATTERY STEWARDSHIPSec.6701. Scope of chapter.6702. Legislative findings.6703. Definitions.6704. Stewardship plans.6705. Retailers.6706. Stewardship plan requirements.123456789101112131415161718 6707. Performance standards.6708. Funding.6709. Collection and management requirements.6710. Education and outreach requirements.6711. Reporting requirements.6712. Fee and department role.6713. Penalties and civil actions.6714. Marking requirements for batteries.6715. General battery disposal and collection requirements.6716. Assessing battery-containing products.6717. Antitrust.6718. Other collection of batteries.§ 6701. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to portable battery stewardship.§ 6702. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) It is in the public interest of the residents of this Commonwealth to encourage the recovery and reuse of materials, including metals, that replace the output of mining and other extractive industries.(2) Without a dedicated battery stewardship program PROGRAMS , battery user confusion regarding proper disposal options will continue to persist.(3) Ensuring the proper handling, recycling and end-of-life management of used batteries prevents the release of toxic materials into the environment and removes materials from the waste stream RECYCLING AND WASTE STREAMS that, if mishandled, may present HEALTH AND safety concerns RISKS to workers AND THE COMMUNITY , including by POSING THE RISK OF igniting fires at RECYCLING AND solid-waste-handling 20250HB1233PN2600 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 facilities AND MATERIAL RECOVERY AND METAL RECYCLING FACILITIES . For this reason, batteries should not be placed into commingled recycling containers or , disposed of via traditional garbage collection containers OR SENT TO MATERIAL RECOVERY AND METAL RECYCLERS . (4) Jurisdictions around the world have successfully implemented battery stewardship laws that have helped address the challenges posed by the end-of-life management of batteries.(5) (4) It is difficult for customers to differentiate between types and chemistries of batteries so it is the best practice for battery stewardship programs to collect all battery types and chemistries.§ 6703. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"ADVANCED BATTERY RECYCLER." AS FOLLOWS:(1) AN ENTITY OR FACILITY THAT IS AUTHORIZED BY THE DEPARTMENT OR AN EQUIVALENT AGENCY IN ANOTHER STATE, OR AN APPLICABLE FEDERAL REGULATORY BODY, AND PERFORMS ONE OR BOTH OF THE FOLLOWING:(I) REFINES COVERED BATTERIES OR COVERED BATTERY MATERIALS BACK TO USEABLE BATTERY MATERIALS.(II) EXTRACTS AND SEPARATES MATERIALS FROM COVERED BATTERIES, INCLUDING METAL COMPOUNDS OR INTERMEDIATE FRACTIONS, AND SENDS THOSE MATERIALS FOR FURTHER PROCESSING OR REFINING TO ANOTHER ADVANCED BATTERY RECYCLER.(2) THE TERM DOES NOT INCLUDE AN ENTITY OR FACILITY THAT 20250HB1233PN2600 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 IS ONLY ENGAGED IN THE COLLECTION OR LOGISTICS OF MOVING MATERIALS FOR RECYCLING."Battery-containing product." A product that contains or is packaged with rechargeable or primary batteries that are covered batteries. The term does not include a covered device as defined by section 102 of the Covered Device Recycling Act."Battery stewardship organization." A producer that directly implements a battery stewardship plan required under this chapter or a nonprofit THIRD-PARTY organization designated by a producer or group of producers to implement a battery stewardship plan required under this chapter."Collection rate." A percentage, by weight, of covered batteries that a battery stewardship organization collects that is calculated by dividing the total weight of primary and rechargeable batteries collected during the previous calendar year by the average annual weight of primary and rechargeable batteries that were estimated to have been sold in this Commonwealth by all producers participating in that approved battery stewardship plan during the previous three calendar years."Covered battery." The term:(1) Includes:(i) A portable battery.(ii) Beginning January 1, 2029, a A medium format battery.(2) Does not include any of the following:(i) A battery contained within a device as specified in 21 U.S.C. § 321(h) (relating to definitions; generally) as it existed as of the effective date of this subparagraph and that is not designed and marketed for 20250HB1233PN2600 - 4 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sale or resale principally to consumers for personal use.(ii) A battery that contains an electrolyte as a free liquid.(iii) A lead acid battery under section 1510 of the Municipal Waste Planning, Recycling and Waste Reduction Act.(iv) A battery in a battery-containing product that is not intended or designed to be easily removed from the battery-containing product.(v) A battery that is a component of a motor vehicle or intended for use exclusively in a motor vehicle. As used in this subparagraph, a motor vehicle:(A) shall include automobiles, vans, trucks, tractors, motorcycles and motorboats; and(B) shall not include e-bikes, scooters or similar mobility devices.(vi) A battery used or intended to be used for the storage of electricity from solar photovoltaic panels."Covered Device Recycling Act." The act of November 23, 2010 (P.L.1083, No.108), known as the Covered Device Recycling Act."Damaged and defective batteries." Batteries that have been damaged or identified by the manufacturer as being defective for safety reasons, that have the potential of producing a dangerous evolution of heat, fire or short circuit, as referred to in 49 CFR 173.185(f) (relating to lithium cells and batteries) as of January 1, 2023, or as may be established by the department by rule to maintain consistency with Federal standards."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Easily removed." Designed by the manufacturer to be removed 20250HB1233PN2600 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by the user of the product with no more than commonly used household tools."MATERIALS RECOVERY FACILITY" OR "MRF." A FACILITY FOR RECEIVING AND PROCESSING SOURCE SEPARATED RECYCLABLE MATERIALS."Medium format battery." Any of the following primary or rechargeable covered batteries:(1) For rechargeable batteries, a battery weighing more than 11 pounds or having a rating of more than 300 watt-hours, or both, but weighing no more than 25 pounds and having a rating of no more than 2,000 watt-hours.(2) For primary batteries, a battery weighing more than 4.4 pounds but not more than 25 pounds."METAL RECYCLER." A SCRAP PROCESSOR AS DEFINED IN SECTION 2 OF THE ACT OF OCTOBER 9, 2008 (P.L.1408, NO.113), KNOWN AS THE SCRAP MATERIAL THEFT PREVENTION ACT . "Municipal Waste Planning, Recycling and Waste Reduction Act." The act of July 28, 1988 (P.L.556, No.101), known as the Municipal Waste Planning, Recycling and Waste Reduction Act."Portable battery." The following primary or rechargeable covered batteries:(1) For rechargeable batteries, a battery weighing no more than 11 pounds and having a rating of no more than 300 watt-hours.(2) For primary batteries, a battery weighing no more than 4.4 pounds."Primary battery." A battery that is not capable of being recharged."Producer." The following person responsible for compliance with requirements under this chapter for a covered battery or battery-containing product sold, offered for sale or distributed 20250HB1233PN2600 - 6 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in or into this Commonwealth:(1) For covered batteries:(i) If the battery is sold under the brand of the battery manufacturer, the producer is the person that manufactures the battery.(ii) If the battery is sold under a retail brand or under a brand owned by a person other than the manufacturer, the producer is the brand owner.(iii) If there is no person to which subparagraph (i) or (ii) of this definition applies, the producer is the person that is the licensee of a brand or trademark under which the battery is used in a commercial enterprise, sold, offered for sale or distributed in or into this Commonwealth, whether or not the trademark is registered in this Commonwealth.(iv) If there is no person described in subparagraph (i), (ii) or (iii) within the United States, the producer is the person who is the importer of record for the battery into the United States for use in a commercial enterprise that sells, offers for sale or distributes the battery in this Commonwealth.(v) If there is no person described in subparagraph (i), (ii), (iii) or (iv) with a commercial presence within this Commonwealth, the producer is the person who first sells, offers for sale or distributes the battery in or into this Commonwealth.(2) For covered battery-containing products:(i) If the battery-containing product is sold under the brand of the product manufacturer, the producer is the person that manufactures the product.20250HB1233PN2600 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) If the battery-containing product is sold under a retail brand or under a brand owned by a person other than the manufacturer, the producer is the brand owner.(iii) If there is no person to which subparagraph (i) or (ii) applies, the producer is the person that is the licensee of a brand or trademark under which the product is used in a commercial enterprise, sold, offered for sale or distributed in or into this Commonwealth, whether or not the trademark is registered in this Commonwealth.(iv) If there is no person described in subparagraph (i), (ii) or (iii) within the United States, the producer is the person who is the importer of record for the product into the United States for use in a commercial enterprise that sells, offers for sale or distributes the product in this Commonwealth.(v) If there is no person described in subparagraph (i), (ii), (iii) or (iv) with a commercial presence within this Commonwealth, the producer is the person who first sells, offers for sale or distributes the product in or into this Commonwealth.(vi) A producer does not include any person who only manufactures, sells, offers for sale, distributes or imports into this Commonwealth a battery-containing product if the only batteries used by the battery-containing product are supplied by a producer that has joined a registered battery stewardship organization as the producer for that covered battery under this chapter. Such a producer of covered batteries that are included in a battery-containing product must provide written 20250HB1233PN2600 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 certification of that membership to both the producer of the covered battery-containing product and the battery stewardship organization of which the battery producer is a member."Program." A program implemented by a battery stewardship organization consistent with an approved battery stewardship plan."Rechargeable battery." A battery that contains one or more voltaic or galvanic cells, electrically connected to produce electric energy and designed to be recharged."Recycling." As defined in section 103 of the Municipal Waste Planning, Recycling and Waste Reduction Act."Recycling efficiency rate." The ratio of the weight of covered battery components and materials recycled by a program operator from covered batteries to the weight of those covered batteries collected by the program operator."Retailer." A person who sells covered batteries or battery-containing products in or into this Commonwealth or offers or otherwise makes available covered batteries or battery-containing products to a customer, including other businesses, in this Commonwealth.§ 6704. Stewardship plans.Beginning January 1, 2027:(1) Each producer selling, offering or making available for sale or distributing covered batteries or battery-containing products in or into this Commonwealth shall participate in an approved State battery stewardship plan through participation in and appropriate funding of a battery stewardship organization.(2) A producer that does not participate in a battery 20250HB1233PN2600 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 stewardship organization and a battery stewardship plan may not sell, offer or make available for sale, or distribute covered batteries or battery-containing products covered by this chapter, in or into this Commonwealth.§ 6705. Retailers.The following apply:(1) Beginning July 1, 2027, for portable batteries, and July 1, 2029, for medium format batteries, a retailer may not sell, offer or make available for sale or distribute a covered battery or battery-containing product unless the producer of the covered battery or battery-containing product certifies to the retailer that the producer participates in a battery stewardship organization whose plan has been approved by the department.(2) A retailer is not in violation of the requirements of paragraph (1) and is not subject to penalties under section 6712 (relating to fee and department role) as long as the publicly accessible Internet website made available by the department under section 6712(b)(3) lists, as of the date a product is made available for retail sale, a producer or brand of covered battery or battery-containing product sold by the retailer as being a participant in an approved plan or the implementer of an approved plan.(3) Retailers of covered batteries or battery-containing products are not required to make retail locations available to serve as collection sites for a stewardship program operated by a battery stewardship organization. Retailers that serve as a collection site must comply with the requirements for collection sites under section 6709 (relating to collection and management requirements).20250HB1233PN2600 - 10 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) A retailer may not sell, offer or make available for sale or distribute covered batteries or battery-containing products, unless those batteries are marked consistent with the requirements of section 6714 (relating to marking requirements for batteries). A producer of a battery-containing product must certify to the retailers of their product that the battery contained in the battery-containing product is marked consistent with the requirements of section 6714. A retailer may rely on this certification for purposes of compliance under this subsection.(5) A retailer selling or offering covered batteries or battery-containing products for sale in this Commonwealth may provide information, provided by the battery stewardship organization, regarding available end-of-life management options for covered batteries collected by the battery stewardship organization. The information that a battery stewardship organization must make available to retailers for voluntary use by retailers must include in-store signage, written materials and other promotional materials that retailers may use to inform customers of the available end-of-life management options for covered batteries collected by the battery stewardship organization.(6) Retailers, producers or battery stewardship organizations must not charge a specific point-of-sale fee to consumers to cover the administrative or operational costs of the battery stewardship organization or the battery stewardship program.§ 6706. Stewardship plan requirements.(a) Approval.--By July 1, 2026, each battery stewardship organization must submit a plan for covered portable batteries 20250HB1233PN2600 - 11 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to the department for approval. By July 1, 2028, each battery stewardship organization must submit a plan for covered medium format batteries to the department for approval. The department must review and may approve a plan based on whether the plan contains the following components:(1) Lists and provides contact information for each producer, battery brand and battery-containing product brand covered in the plan.(2) Proposes performance goals, consistent with section 6707 (relating to performance standards), including establishing performance goals for each of the next three upcoming calendar years of program implementation.(3) Describes how the battery stewardship organization will make retailers aware of the retailer's obligation to sell only covered batteries and battery-containing products of producers participating in an approved plan.(4) Describes the education and communications strategy being implemented to effectively promote participation in the approved battery stewardship program and provide the information necessary for effective participation of consumers, retailers and others.(5) Describes how the battery stewardship organization will make available to collection sites, for voluntary use, signage, written materials and other promotional materials that collection sites may use to inform consumers of the available end-of-life management options for covered batteries collected by the battery stewardship organization.(6) Lists promotional activities to be undertaken, and the identification of consumer awareness goals and strategies that the program will employ to achieve these goals after the 20250HB1233PN2600 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program is implemented.(7) Includes collection site safety training procedures related to covered battery collection activities at collection sites, including appropriate protocols to reduce risks of spills or fires and response protocols in the event of a spill or fire, and a protocol for safe management of damaged batteries that are returned to collection sites.(8) Describes the method to establish and administer a means for fully funding the program in a manner that equitably distributes the program's costs among the producers that are part of the battery stewardship organization. For producers that elect to meet the requirements of this chapter individually, without joining a battery stewardship organization, the plan must describe the proposed method to establish and administer a means for fully funding the program.(9) Describes the financing methods used to implement the plan, consistent with section 6707.(10) Describes how the program will collect all covered battery chemistries and brands on a free, continuous, convenient, visible and accessible basis, and consistent with the requirements of section 6709 (relating to collection and management requirements), including a description of how the Statewide convenience standard will be met and a list of collection sites, including the addresses of collection sites.(11) Describes the criteria to be used in the program to determine whether an entity may serve as a collection site for discarded batteries under the program.(12) Establishes collection goals for each of the first 20250HB1233PN2600 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 three years of implementation of the battery stewardship plan that are based on the estimated total weight of primary and rechargeable covered batteries that have been sold in this Commonwealth in the previous three calendar years by the producers participating in the battery stewardship plan.(13) Identifies proposed sorters, transporters, processors and , ADVANCED BATTERY RECYCLERS AND OTHER facilities to be used by the program for the final disposition of batteries and how collected batteries will be managed in an environmentally sound manner at ALL THE facilities operating in compliance with human health and environmental protection standards that are broadly equivalent to or better than those required in the United States.(14) Details how the program will help this Commonwealth achieve the target recycling efficiency rate, calculated consistent with section 6711 (relating to reporting requirements), of at least 60% for rechargeable batteries and at least 70% for primary batteries.(15) Describes how the public education and outreach components of the program under section 6710 (relating to education and outreach requirements) will be implemented.(b) Review.--The department shall review the stewardship plan for compliance with this chapter and shall approve, disapprove or conditionally approve the plan within 120 days of receipt of the plan. The following shall apply:(1) If the department disapproves a stewardship plan submitted by a battery stewardship organization, the department shall explain how the stewardship plan does not comply with this chapter and provide written notice to the 20250HB1233PN2600 - 14 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 battery stewardship organization within 30 days of disapproval.(2) The battery stewardship organization may resubmit to the department a revised stewardship plan within 60 days of the date the written notice was issued and the department shall review the revised stewardship plan within 90 days of resubmittal.(3) If a revised stewardship plan is disapproved by the department, a producer operating under the stewardship plan shall not be in compliance with this chapter until the department approves a stewardship plan submitted by a battery stewardship organization that covers the producer's products.(c) New plan required.--A battery stewardship organization must submit a new plan to the department for approval:(1) If there are significant changes to the methods of collection, transport or end-of-life management of covered batteries under section 6709 that are not provided for in the plan. The department shall identify the types of significant changes that require a new plan to be submitted to the department for approval. For purposes of this paragraph, adding or removing a processor or transporter under the plan is not considered a significant change that requires a plan resubmittal.(2) To address the novel inclusion of medium format batteries as covered batteries under the plan.(3) (2) No less than every five years. (d) Amendments.--A battery stewardship organization must provide plan amendments to the department for approval:(1) When proposing changes to the performance goals under section 6707 based on the up-to-date experience of the 20250HB1233PN2600 - 15 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program.(2) When there is a change to the method of financing plan implementation under section 6708 (relating to funding). This does not include changes to the fees or fee structure established in the plan.(3) When adding or removing a processor, as part of a quarterly update submitted to the department.(e) Quarterly notifications.--A battery stewardship organization must notify the department on a quarterly basis if a producer begins or ceases to participate in a battery stewardship organization. This quarterly notice, if required, must include a current list of the producers and brands participating in the plan.(f) Revised plan.--No earlier than five years after the initial approval of a plan, the department may require a battery stewardship organization to submit a revised plan, which may include improvements to the collection site network or increased expenditures dedicated to education and outreach, if the approved plan has not met the performance goals under section 6707.§ 6707. Performance standards.(a) Goals required.--Each battery stewardship plan must include performance goals that measure, on an annual basis, the achievements of the program, including:(1) The collection rate for batteries in this Commonwealth.(2) The recycling efficiency rate of the program.(3) Public convenience and accessibility of the program.(b) Targets.--The performance goals established in each battery stewardship plan must include:20250HB1233PN2600 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Target collection rates for primary batteries and for rechargeable batteries.(2) Target recycling efficiency rates of at least 60% for rechargeable batteries and at least 70% for primary batteries.(3) Goals for convenience and accessibility that meet or exceed the minimum requirements established in section 6709 (relating to collection and management requirements).(4) A battery stewardship organization is not authorized to reduce or cease collection, education and outreach or other activities implemented under an approved plan based on achievement of program performance goals.§ 6708. Funding.(a) Availability.--Each battery stewardship organization must ensure that adequate funding is available to fully implement approved battery stewardship plans, including the implementation of aspects of the plan addressing:(1) Covered battery collection, transporting and processing.(2) Education and outreach.(3) Program evaluation.(4) Payment of the administrative fees to the department under section 6712 (relating to fee and department role).(b) Collection of funds.--A battery stewardship organization implementing a battery stewardship plan on behalf of producers must develop a system to collect charges from participating producers to cover the costs of plan implementation. Each battery stewardship organization:(1) Is responsible for all costs of participating covered battery collection, transportation, processing, 20250HB1233PN2600 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 education, administration, department reimbursement, recycling and end-of-life management in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.(2) Shall adopt environmentally sound management practices which include the following:(i) Comply with all applicable laws and rules in place to protect workers, public health and the environment.(ii) Provide for adequate recordkeeping, tracking and documenting of the fate of materials within this Commonwealth and beyond.(iii) Include comprehensive liability coverage for the battery stewardship organization, including environmental liability coverage that is commercially practicable.(3) Must reimburse local governments and solid waste or , SOLID WASTE, METAL RECYCLERS, MRFS OR OTHER recyclables handling facilities for demonstrable costs incurred as a result of a local government facility or solid waste or , METAL RECYCLER, MRF OR OTHER recyclables handling facility serving as a collection site for its program, including associated labor costs, storage and other costs associated with accessibility and collection site standards. THE FOLLOWING APPLY REGARDING REIMBURSEMENT FOR INVOLUNTARILY RECEIVED OR ACCUMULATED COVERED BATTERIES:(I) A METAL RECYCLER OR MRF THAT, IN THE ORDINARY COURSE OF ITS BUSINESS AND WITHOUT ACTIVELY SOLICITING OR INTENTIONALLY COLLECTING BATTERIES FROM THE PUBLIC, INVOLUNTARILY RECEIVES OR ACCUMULATES COVERED BATTERIES OUTSIDE A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM MAY TRANSFER THOSE 20250HB1233PN2600 - 18 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 BATTERIES TO A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION AND SEEK REIMBURSEMENT UNDER THIS SECTION, NOTWITHSTANDING THE RESTRICTIONS UNDER SECTION 6709 (RELATING TO COLLECTION AND MANAGEMENT REQUIREMENTS) AND EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 6718(B) (RELATING TO OTHER COLLECTION OF BATTERIES). NOTHING IN THIS SECTION OR IN SECTION 6709 SHALL PRECLUDE A METAL RECYCLER OR MRF FROM RECEIVING REIMBURSEMENT FOR TRANSFERRING DAMAGED OR DEFECTIVE BATTERIES THAT HAVE BEEN UNINTENTIONALLY COLLECTED AT ITS FACILITY.(II) TO QUALIFY FOR REIMBURSEMENT, THE FACILITY SHALL:(A) ENTER INTO A WRITTEN REIMBURSEMENT AGREEMENT WITH THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION, WHICH DOES NOT IMPOSE ANY COSTS ON THE METAL RECYCLER OR MRF AND IS OTHERWISE FAIR AND REASONABLE TO THE METAL RECYCLER OR MRF IN SCOPE;(B) STORE AND HANDLE THE BATTERIES IN COMPLIANCE WITH APPLICABLE FEDERAL, STATE AND LOCAL LAWS, INCLUDING UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION REGULATIONS; AND(C) PROVIDE THE CUMULATIVE BATTERY WEIGHT DATA REQUIRED UNDER SECTION 6718 TO THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION.(III) UPON COMPLIANCE WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (II), THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION SHALL REIMBURSE THE FACILITY FOR ITS REASONABLE, DEMONSTRABLE INCREMENTAL COSTS RELATED TO SAFE STORAGE, PACKAGING, TRANSPORTATION AND DISPOSITION OF THE BATTERIES.(IV) AT THE REQUEST OF THE METAL RECYCLER OR MRF, 20250HB1233PN2600 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION SHALL SUPPLY APPROPRIATE PACKAGING MATERIALS AND SHALL ARRANGE FOR PICKUP AND TRANSPORTATION OF THE COVERED BATTERIES TO THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION'S DESIGNATED RECEIVING LOCATION AT NO COST TO THE METAL RECYCLER OR MRF, NOTWITHSTANDING THE RESTRICTIONS UNDER SECTION 6709. THE WRITTEN REIMBURSEMENT AGREEMENT FOR ANY METAL RECYCLER OR MRF OR ANY PARTICULAR FACILITY OF THE METAL RECYCLER OR MRF EXECUTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION SHALL INCLUDE INFORMATION RELATING TO THE FREQUENCY OF THE PICKUP AND TRANSPORTATION OF COVERED BATTERIES BEING TRANSFERRED TO A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION, WHICH SHALL BE OFFERED AT A REASONABLE FREQUENCY, AT LEAST MONTHLY.(V) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO OBLIGATE OR PREVENT A METAL RECYCLER OR MRF TO ACCEPT BATTERIES FROM THE PUBLIC OR SERVE AS A DESIGNATED COLLECTION SITE UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH.(4) Shall, at a minimum, provide collection sites with appropriate containers for covered batteries subject to its program, training, signage, safety guidance and educational materials, at no cost to the collection sites.§ 6709. Collection and management requirements.(a) Collection.--Each battery stewardship organization implementing a battery stewardship plan must provide for the collection of all covered batteries, including all chemistries and brands of covered batteries, on a free, continuous, convenient, visible and accessible basis to any person, business, government department or agency or nonprofit organization. Except as provided in subsection (b)(2), each 20250HB1233PN2600 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 battery stewardship plan must allow any person, business, government department or agency or nonprofit organization to deliver each chemistry and brand of covered battery at each collection site that counts toward the satisfaction of the collection site criteria in subsection (c).(b) Requirements.--Each battery stewardship organization implementing a battery stewardship plan must provide as follows:(1) For each collection site utilized by the program, suitable collection containers for covered batteries that are segregated from other solid waste or make mutually agreeable alternative arrangements for the collection of batteries at the site. The location of collection containers at each collection site used by the program must be within view of a responsible person and must be accompanied by signage made available to the collection site by the battery stewardship organization that informs customers regarding the end-of-life management options for batteries provided by the collection site under this chapter. Each collection site must meet applicable Federal, State and local regulatory requirements while adhering to the operations manual and other safety information provided to the collection site by the battery stewardship organization.(2) That medium format batteries may only be collected at household hazardous waste collection sites or other staffed collection sites that meet applicable Federal, State and local regulatory requirements to manage medium format batteries.(3) For damaged and defective batteries:(i) Collected only at collection sites staffed by persons trained to handle and ship those batteries.20250HB1233PN2600 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Each battery stewardship organization must provide for collection in each county of this Commonwealth, either through collection sites or collection events, with qualified staff as specified in subparagraph (i). Collection events should be provided periodically throughout the year where practicable, but must be provided at least once per year at a minimum, in each county in which there are not permanent collection sites providing for the collection of damaged and defective batteries.(c) Management.--Each battery stewardship organization implementing a battery stewardship plan must provide as follows:(1) A battery stewardship plan that ensures Statewide collection opportunities for all covered batteries. The following shall apply:(i) Battery stewardship organizations shall coordinate activities with other program operators, including other covered battery collection and recycling programs and , electronic waste recyclers AND ADVANCED BATTERY RECYCLERS , with regard to the proper management or recycling of collected covered batteries, for purposes of providing the efficient delivery of services and avoiding unnecessary duplication of effort and expense.(ii) Statewide collection opportunities must be determined by geographic information that considers permanent collection sites.(iii) A program may rely, in part, on collection events to supplement the permanent collection services required in paragraphs (2) and (3).(iv) Only permanent collection services specified in 20250HB1233PN2600 - 22 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 paragraphs (2) and (3) qualify toward the satisfaction of the requirements of this subsection.(2) For portable batteries, each battery stewardship organization ORGANIZATIONS must , IN COORDINATION WITH OTHER APPROVED BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATIONS, COLLECTIVELY provide Statewide collection opportunities that include:(i) One permanent collection site in each county that has a population density that is less than 250 individuals per square mile.(ii) Two permanent collection sites in each county that has a population density that is greater than or equal to 250 individuals per square mile but less than 500 individuals per square mile.(iii) Three permanent collection sites in each county that has a population density that is greater than or equal to 500 individuals per square mile but less than 750 individuals per square mile.(iv) Four permanent collection sites in each county that has a population density that is greater than or equal to 750 individuals per square mile but less than 1,000 individuals per square mile.(v) Five permanent collection sites in each county that has a population density that is greater than or equal to 1,000 individuals per square mile but less than 5,000 individuals per square mile.(vi) Fifteen permanent collection sites in each county that has a population density that is greater than or equal to 5,000 individuals per square mile.(vii) If a municipality has a population of more than 1,000,000 residents, the program shall provide 10 20250HB1233PN2600 - 23 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 additional permanent collection sites to be located within that municipality, with the collection sites required by paragraph (vi) to be located, to the extent reasonably possible, outside the municipality.(viii) Collection opportunities for portable batteries at special locations where batteries are often spent and replaced, including supervised locations at parks with stores and campgrounds.(3) For medium format batteries, a battery stewardship organization ORGANIZATIONS must , IN COORDINATION WITH OTHER APPROVED BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATIONS, COLLECTIVELY provide statewide collection opportunities that include:(i) At least 10 permanent collection sites in this Commonwealth during the initial five-year plan period.(ii) Reasonable geographic dispersion of permanent collection sites throughout this Commonwealth.(iii) After the initial five-year plan period, a permanent collection site in each county of at least 200,000 persons, as determined by the most recent Federal decennial census.(iv) A battery stewardship organization must ensure that there is a collection event at least once every three years in each county of this Commonwealth which does not have a permanent collection site. The collection events must provide for the collection of all medium format batteries, including damaged and defective batteries.(d) Services and facilities.--Each battery stewardship organization implementing a battery stewardship plan must:(1) Use existing PERMITTED public and private waste 20250HB1233PN2600 - 24 - <--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 collection services and facilities, including where cost effective, mutually agreeable and otherwise practicable, battery collection sites that are established through other battery collection programs, services, transporters, consolidators, processors and retailers.(2) Use as a collection site for covered batteries any retailer, wholesaler, municipality, solid waste management facility, household hazardous waste facility , METAL RECYCLER, MRF, ADVANCED BATTERY RECYCLER or other entity that meets the criteria for collection sites in the approved plan up to the minimum number of sites required for compliance with subsection (c), upon the submission of a request by an entity to the battery stewardship organization to serve as a collection site. Battery stewardship programs may use additional collection sites in excess of the minimum required in subsection (c) as may be agreed upon between the battery stewardship organization and the collection site.(3) Use as a site for a collection event for covered batteries a retailer, wholesaler, municipality, solid waste management facility, household hazardous waste facility or other entity that meets the criteria for collection events in the approved plan up to the minimum number of sites required for compliance with subsection (c), upon the submission of a request by an entity to the battery stewardship organization to serve as a site for a collection event. Battery stewardship programs may use additional sites for collection events in excess of the minimum required in subsection (c) as may be agreed upon between the battery stewardship organization and the collection site.(4) A battery stewardship organization may issue a 20250HB1233PN2600 - 25 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 warning, suspend or terminate a collection site or service that does not adhere to the collection site criteria in the approved plan or that poses an immediate health and safety concern.(e) Programs.--Battery stewardship programs:(1) Are required to provide for the collection of loose covered batteries.(2) Are not required to provide for the collection of battery-containing products.(3) Are not required to provide for the collection of batteries that either:(i) Are not easily removed from the product other than by the manufacturer.(ii) Remain contained in a battery-containing product at the time of delivery to a collection site.(4) Are not required to provide for the collection of batteries still contained in a covered device as defined by the Covered Device Recycling Act.§ 6710. Education and outreach requirements.(a) Promotional activities.--Each battery stewardship organization must carry out promotional activities in support of plan implementation, including all of the following:(1) Development and maintenance of a publicly accessible Internet website.(2) Development and distribution of periodic press releases and articles.(3) Development and placement of advertisements for use on social media , TELEVISION, CABLE or other relevant media platforms.(4) Development of promotional materials about the 20250HB1233PN2600 - 26 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program , FIRE RISKS and the restriction on the disposal of covered batteries in section 6715 (relating to general battery disposal and collection requirements) to be used by retailers, government agencies, waste and recycling collectors, nonprofit organizations and other entities or individuals.(5) Development and distribution of collection site safety training procedures that are in compliance with Commonwealth law applicable to collection sites to help ensure proper management of covered batteries at collection sites.(6) Development and implementation of outreach and educational resources that are conceptually, linguistically and culturally accurate for the communities served and reach this Commonwealth's diverse ethnic populations, including through meaningful consultation with communities that bear disproportionately higher levels of adverse environmental and social justice impacts.(b) Information required.--Each battery stewardship organization must provide:(1) Consumer-focused educational promotional materials to each collection site used by the program and accessible by customers of retailers that sell covered batteries or battery-containing products.(2) Safety information related to covered battery collection activities to the operator of each collection site, including appropriate protocols to reduce risks of spills or fires, response protocols in the event of a spill or fire and response protocols in the event of detection of a damaged or defective battery.20250HB1233PN2600 - 27 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Educational materials to the operator of each collection site for the management of recalled batteries, which are not intended to be part of collection as provided under section 6709 (relating to collection and management requirements), to help facilitate transportation and processing of recalled batteries.(c) Reimbursement.--A battery stewardship organization may seek reimbursement from the producer of any recalled battery for expenses incurred in the collection, transportation or processing of those batteries.(d) Duties.--Upon request by a retailer or other potential collector, the battery stewardship organization must provide the retailer or other potential collector educational materials describing collection opportunities for batteries.(e) Reporting.--If multiple battery stewardship organizations are implementing plans approved by the department, the battery stewardship organizations must coordinate in carrying out the education and outreach responsibilities under this section and must include in the annual reports to the department under section 6711 (relating to reporting requirements) a summary of the coordinated education and outreach efforts.§ 6711. Reporting requirements.(a) Annual reports.--By June 1, 2028 2027 , and each June 1 thereafter, each battery stewardship organization must submit an annual report to the department covering the preceding calendar year of battery stewardship plan implementation. The report must include:(1) A summary financial statement in accordance with the following:20250HB1233PN2600 - 28 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The statement must:(A) Document the financing of the battery stewardship organization's program.(B) Provide an analysis of program costs and expenditures, including an analysis of the program's expenses, including collection, transportation, recycling, education and administrative overhead.(C) Be sufficiently detailed to provide transparency that funds collected from producers as a result of their activities in this Commonwealth are spent on program implementation in this Commonwealth.(ii) Battery stewardship organizations implementing similar battery stewardship programs in multiple states may submit a financial statement including all covered states, as long as the statement breaks out financial information pertinent to this Commonwealth.(2) The weight, by chemistry, of covered batteries collected under the program.(3) The weight of materials recycled from covered batteries collected under the program, in total, and by method of battery recycling.(4) A calculation of the recycling efficiency rates, as measured consistent with subsection (b).(5) For each facility used for the final disposition of batteries, a description of how the facility recycled or otherwise disposed of batteries and battery components.(6) The weight and chemistry of batteries sent to each facility used for the final disposition of batteries. The information in subsection (a)(5) may be approximated for program operations in this Commonwealth based on 20250HB1233PN2600 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 extrapolations of national or regional data for programs in operation in multiple states.(7) The collection rate achieved under the program, including a description of how this collection rate was calculated and how the collection rate compares to the collection rate goals under section 6707 (relating to performance standards).(8) The estimated aggregate sales, by weight and chemistry, of batteries and batteries contained in or with battery-containing products sold in this Commonwealth by participating producers for each of the previous three calendar years.(9) A description of the manner in which the collected batteries were managed and recycled, including a discussion of best available technologies and the recycling efficiency rate.(10) A description of education and outreach efforts supporting plan implementation, including:(i) A summary of education and outreach provided to consumers, collection sites, manufacturers, distributors and retailers by the program operator for the purpose of promoting the collection and recycling of covered batteries.(ii) A description of how the education under subparagraph (i) and outreach meet the requirements of section 6710 (relating to education and outreach requirements).(iii) Samples of education and outreach materials.(iv) A summary of coordinated education and outreach efforts with any other battery stewardship organizations 20250HB1233PN2600 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 implementing a plan approved by the department.(v) A summary of any changes made during the previous calendar year to education and outreach activities.(11) A list of all collection sites, an address for each listed site and an up-to-date map indicating the location of all collection sites used to implement the program, with links to appropriate publicly accessible Internet websites if there are existing publicly accessible Internet websites associated with a site.(12) A description of methods used to collect, transport and recycle covered batteries by the battery stewardship organization.(13) A summary on progress made toward the program performance goals established under section 6707 and an explanation of why performance goals were not met, if applicable.(b) Count.--The weight of batteries or recovered resources from those batteries must only be counted once and may not be counted by more than one battery stewardship organization.(c) Other reporting requirements.--In addition to the requirements of subsection (a), with respect to each facility used in the processing or disposition of batteries collected under the program, each battery stewardship organization must report:(1) Whether the facility is located domestically, in an organization for economic cooperation and development country or in a country that meets organization for economic cooperation and development operating standards.(2) What facilities processed the batteries and for 20250HB1233PN2600 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 domestic facilities a summary of any violations of environmental laws and regulations over the previous three years at each facility.(d) Covered batteries.--If a battery stewardship organization has disposed of covered batteries through energy recovery, incineration or landfilling during the preceding calendar year of program implementation, the annual report must specify the steps that the battery stewardship organization will take to make the recycling of covered batteries cost effective, where possible, or to otherwise increase battery recycling rates achieved by the battery stewardship organization.(e) Confidentiality.--(1) A producer or battery stewardship organization that submits information or records to the department under this chapter may request that the information or records be made available only for the confidential use of the department, the secretary of the department or the appropriate division of the department.(2) The Secretary of Environmental Protection must consider the request and if this action is not detrimental to the public interest and can otherwise be restricted in accordance with the policies and purposes of the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, the Secretary of Environmental Protection must grant the request for the information to remain confidential.§ 6712. Fee and department role.(a) Fees.--Each battery stewardship organization submitting a battery stewardship plan, revision or amendment, shall pay a fee to the department as follows:(1) The fee shall be sufficient to cover the 20250HB1233PN2600 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department's full costs of implementing, administering and enforcing this chapter.(2) Prior to June 1, 2026, and every other June 1 thereafter, the department shall identify the costs incurred under this section and set a fee schedule for plan submissions that is adequate to reimburse the department's full costs of administering this chapter.(3) The total amount of the annual fees collected under this section shall not exceed the amount necessary to reimburse costs incurred by the department to administer this section.(b) Departmental duties.--The responsibilities of the department in implementing, administering and enforcing this chapter include:(1) Reviewing submitted stewardship plans and plan amendments and making determinations on the plan or plan amendment. The following shall apply:(i) The department must provide a letter of approval or conditional approval for the plan or plan amendment if the plan provides for the establishment of a stewardship program that meets the requirements of sections 6706 (relating to stewardship plan requirements), 6707 (relating to performance standards), 6708 (relating to funding), 6709 (relating to collection and management requirements) and 6710 (relating to education and outreach requirements).(ii) If a plan or plan amendment is rejected, the department must provide the reasons for rejecting the plan to the battery stewardship organization. The battery stewardship organization must submit a new plan within 60 20250HB1233PN2600 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 days after receipt of the letter of disapproval.(iii) If a plan or an amendment to an approved plan is submitted under this section, the department shall make the proposed plan or amendment available for public review and comment for at least 30 days.(2) Reviewing annual reports submitted under section 6711 (relating to reporting requirements) within 90 days of submission to ensure compliance with that section.(3) Ensuring public awareness by:(i) Maintaining a publicly accessible Internet website that lists producers and the brands that are participating in an approved battery stewardship plan, and that makes available to the public each plan, plan amendment and annual report received by the department under this chapter.(ii) Upon the date the first plan is approved or conditionally approved, posting on the department's publicly accessible Internet website a list of producers and the brands for which the department has approved a plan. The department must update the list of producers and brands participating under an approved program plan based on information provided to the department from battery stewardship organizations.(4) Providing technical assistance to producers and retailers related to the requirements of this chapter and issuing orders or imposing civil penalties authorized under section 6713 (relating to penalties and civil actions) where the technical assistance efforts do not lead to compliance by a producer or retailer.§ 6713. Penalties and civil actions.20250HB1233PN2600 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Civil penalty.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a person who violates any provision of this chapter is liable for a civil penalty of $2,500 per violation.(2) For the failure to pay a fee under this chapter, a person who fails to pay the fee is liable for a civil penalty that is double the applicable fee.(b) Civil actions.--The penalties under this section may be recovered in a civil action brought by the department. Any penalties collected under this section in an action in which the department has prevailed shall be deposited into the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, Recycling Fund, to be used in accordance with the provision of the Municipal Waste Planning, Recycling and Waste Reduction Act.(c) Other civil remedies.--The department may institute a civil action for an injunction, prohibitory or mandatory, to restrain violations of this chapter or to require actions as may be necessary to address violations of this chapter.(d) Other remedies.--The penalties and injunctions provided in this chapter are in addition to any penalties, injunctions or other relief under any other State law. Nothing in this chapter bars a cause of action by the Commonwealth for any other penalty, injunction or other relief provided by any other applicable law.(e) Falsification.--A person who knowingly makes a false, fictitious or fraudulent material statement, orally or in writing, to the department, related to or required by this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, commits a misdemeanor of the third degree, under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904(b) (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).20250HB1233PN2600 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Limitation.--No penalty may be assessed on an individual or resident for the improper disposal of covered batteries under section 6715 (relating to general battery disposal and collection requirements) in a noncommercial or residential setting.§ 6714. Marking requirements for batteries.(a) Marking.--Beginning January 1, 2028 2027 , a producer or retailer may only sell, distribute or offer for sale in or into this Commonwealth a medium format battery, covered battery or battery-containing product that contains a battery that is designed or intended to be easily removed from the product, if the battery is:(1) Marked with an identification of the producer of the battery, unless the battery is less than one-half inch in diameter or does not contain a surface whose length exceeds one-half inch.(2) Beginning January 1, 2030, marked with proper labeling to ensure proper collection and recycling, by identifying the chemistry of the battery, including an indication that the battery should not be disposed of as household waste.(b) Certification.--A producer shall certify to the producer's customers, or to the retailer if the retailer is not the customer, that the requirements of this section have been met, under section 6705 (relating to retailers).(c) Amendments to requirements.--The department may amend, by rule, the requirements of subsection (a) to maintain consistency with the labeling requirements or voluntary standards for batteries established by Federal law.§ 6715. General battery disposal and collection requirements.20250HB1233PN2600 - 36 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Effective January 1, 2027, for portable batteries and January 1, 2029, for medium format batteries, the following shall apply: (1) Each person must handle unwanted covered batteries through one of the following options:(i) Delivery to the collection sites established by or included in the programs created by this chapter.(ii) For covered batteries generated by persons that are regulated generators of batteries covered under Federal or State hazardous or solid waste laws, management in a manner consistent with the requirements of those laws.(III) THROUGH A COLLECTION PROGRAM COMPLIANT WITH SECTION 6718 (RELATING TO OTHER COLLECTION OF BATTERIES).(2) A EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 6718, A fee may not be charged at the time unwanted covered batteries are delivered or collected for management.(3) All covered batteries may only be collected, transported and processed in a manner that meets the standards established for a battery stewardship organization in a plan approved by the department, unless the batteries are being managed as described in paragraph (1)(ii) OR (III) . (4) A person may not place covered batteries in waste OR RECYCLING containers for disposal OR PROCESSING at incinerators, waste-to-energy facilities or landfills , LANDFILLS, MRFS OR METAL RECYCLING FACILITIES . (5) A person may not place covered batteries in or on a container for mixed recyclables unless there is a separate location or compartment made available and designated for the covered battery that complies with local government collection standards or guidelines AND THE PLACEMENT WAS 20250HB1233PN2600 - 37 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AUTHORIZED BY THE RECEIVING FACILITY . (6) An owner or operator of a solid waste OR RECYCLABLE MATERIALS facility may not be found in violation of this section if the facility has posted in a conspicuous location a sign stating that covered batteries must be managed through collection sites established by a battery stewardship organization and are not accepted for disposal OR RECYCLING AT THE FACILITY . (7) A solid waste OR RECYCLABLE MATERIALS collector may not be found in violation of this section for a covered battery placed in a disposal OR RECYCLING container by the generator of the covered battery.§ 6716. Assessing battery-containing products.(a) Assessment required.--By July 1, 2028 2027 , each battery stewardship organization must complete an assessment of the opportunities and challenges associated with the end-of-life management of batteries not intended or designed to be easily removed by a customer that are contained in battery-containing products, including medical devices, and in electronic products that are not covered devices as defined by the Covered Device Recycling Act.(b) Consultations.--Each battery stewardship organization must consult with the department, other battery stewardship organizations and interested stakeholders in completing the assessment. The assessment must identify any adjustments to the stewardship program requirements established in this chapter that would enhance public health, safety and environmental benefits.(c) Topics.--The assessment must consider:(1) The different categories and uses of battery-20250HB1233PN2600 - 38 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 containing products.(2) The current methods by which unwanted battery-containing products are managed in this Commonwealth and nearby states.(3) Challenges posed by the potential collection, management and transport of battery-containing products, including challenges associated with removing batteries that were not intended or designed to be easily removed from products, other than by the manufacturer.(4) Which criteria of this chapter may apply to battery-containing products in a manner that is identical or analogous to the requirements applicable to covered batteries.(d) Report.--By October 1, 2028 2027 , the department must submit a report to the General Assembly containing the findings of the assessments required in this section.§ 6717. Antitrust.Producers and battery stewardship organizations acting on behalf of producers that prepare, submit and implement a battery stewardship program plan pursuant to this chapter and who are thereby subject to regulation by the department, are granted immunity from Commonwealth laws relating to antitrust, restraint of trade, unfair trade practices and other regulation of trade and commerce, for the limited purpose of planning, reporting and operating their battery stewardship program, including:(1) The creation, implementation or management of a battery stewardship organization and any battery stewardship plan regardless of whether the plan is submitted, denied or approved.(2) The determination of the cost and structure of a 20250HB1233PN2600 - 39 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 battery stewardship plan.(3) The types or quantities of batteries being recycled or otherwise managed under this chapter.§ 6718. Other collection of batteries.Nothing in this chapter shall prevent or prohibit an individual or entity from offering or performing a fee-based household collection or a mail-back program for end-of-life portable batteries or medium format batteries independently of a battery stewardship program if the individual or entity meets the following requirements:(1) The services must be performed, and the facilities must be operated, in compliance with all applicable Federal, State and local laws and requirements, including all applicable United States Department of Transportation regulations and all applicable provisions of State law.(2) The individual or entity must make available all batteries collected from customers within this Commonwealth to the battery stewardship organization.(3) After consolidation of portable or medium format batteries at the facilities, the costs for transporting the batteries to the battery stewardship organization's designated sorters or processors shall be at the battery stewardship organization's expense.(A) HOUSEHOLD COLLECTION OR MAIL-BACK SERVICE.--NOTHING IN THIS CHAPTER SHALL PREVENT OR PROHIBIT A PERSON OR RECYCLER, INCLUDING AN ADVANCED BATTERY RECYCLER, METAL RECYCLER OR MRF, FROM OFFERING OR PERFORMING A COLLECTION SERVICE, INCLUDING A FEE-BASED HOUSEHOLD COLLECTION SERVICE, MAIL-BACK PROGRAM OR COMMUNITY DROP-OFF SITE FOR COVERED BATTERIES INDEPENDENTLY OF A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION IF ALL OF THE FOLLOWING APPLY:20250HB1233PN2600 - 40 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) THE PERSON OR RECYCLER HAS REGISTERED WITH THE DEPARTMENT AND PROVIDED TO THE DEPARTMENT A DETAILED EXPLANATION OF THE SERVICES OFFERED AND THE MEASURES THAT WILL BE FOLLOWED TO ENSURE THE SAFE AND ENVIRONMENTALLY PROTECTIVE COLLECTION, MANAGEMENT AND TRANSPORTATION OF BATTERIES COLLECTED.(2) THE SERVICES ARE PERFORMED AND FACILITIES ARE OPERATED IN COMPLIANCE WITH ALL APPLICABLE FEDERAL, STATE AND LOCAL LAWS AND REQUIREMENTS.(3) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B), ALL BATTERIES COLLECTED BY THE PERSON OR METAL RECYCLER FROM CUSTOMERS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH ARE PROVIDED TO AND IN COMPLIANCE WITH THE STANDARDS ESTABLISHED BY A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION IMPLEMENTING A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PLAN APPROVED UNDER SECTION 6712 (RELATING TO FEE AND DEPARTMENT ROLE). THE FOLLOWING APPLY:(I) AFTER PROVIDING COLLECTED BATTERIES TO THE APPROVED BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION, ANY TRANSPORT AND PROCESSING OF THE BATTERIES BY THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION SHALL BE DONE AT THE BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION'S EXPENSE.(II) A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION MAY REFUSE TO ACCEPT BATTERIES FROM THE PERSON OR RECYCLER IF THE DEPARTMENT IS NOTIFIED OF THE REASON FOR THE REFUSAL.(B) EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS AND DATA.--(1) A PERSON OR RECYCLER DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A) MAY KEEP THE COVERED BATTERIES COLLECTED FROM CUSTOMERS IN THIS COMMONWEALTH FOR THE PURPOSE OF RECYCLING IF THE PERSON OR RECYCLER PROVIDES EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS TO ALL CUSTOMERS ON THE PROPER MANAGEMENT OF COVERED BATTERIES AND ANNUALLY 20250HB1233PN2600 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROVIDES COLLECTION AND RECYCLING DATA TO THE DEPARTMENT BY MARCH 31 COVERING THE PRIOR CALENDAR YEAR. THE DATA SHALL INCLUDE THE FOLLOWING FOR ALL COVERED BATTERIES KEPT FOR RECYCLING:(I) THE WEIGHT, BY CHEMISTRY, OF ALL THE COVERED BATTERIES COLLECTED.(II) THE WEIGHT OF MATERIALS RECYCLED FROM THE COVERED BATTERIES, IN TOTAL AND BY METHOD OF BATTERY RECYCLING.(III) A CALCULATION OF THE PERSON'S OR RECYCLER'S RECYCLING EFFICIENCY RATE FOR THE COVERED BATTERIES.(IV) A LIST OF ALL FACILITIES USED IN THE PROCESSING OR DISPOSITION OF THE COVERED BATTERIES AND A SUMMARY OF ANY VIOLATIONS OF ENVIRONMENTAL LAWS AND REGULATIONS DURING THE PREVIOUS THREE YEARS AT EACH FACILITY.(V) A DESCRIPTION OF HOW EACH FACILITY USED FOR THE FINAL DISPOSITION OF THE COVERED BATTERIES RECYCLED OR OTHERWISE MANAGED BATTERIES AND BATTERY COMPONENTS.(VI) THE WEIGHT AND CHEMISTRY OF THE COVERED BATTERIES SENT TO EACH FACILITY THAT IS USED FOR THE FINAL DISPOSITION OF THE BATTERIES.(2) A PERSON OR RECYCLER MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION FROM A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION FOR ANY COVERED BATTERIES COLLECTED, TRANSPORTED OR RECYCLED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.(C) BATTERY COLLECTION EVENTS.--A PERSON OR RECYCLER MAY SPONSOR BATTERY COLLECTION EVENTS INDEPENDENTLY OF A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP PROGRAM, IF THE EVENTS ARE REGISTERED WITH THE DEPARTMENT AT LEAST 30 DAYS IN ADVANCE AND THE PERSON OR RECYCLER COMPLIES WITH THE FOLLOWING REQUIREMENTS:20250HB1233PN2600 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) THE SERVICES MUST BE PERFORMED, AND THE FACILITIES MUST BE OPERATED, IN COMPLIANCE WITH ALL APPLICABLE FEDERAL, STATE AND LOCAL LAWS AND REQUIREMENTS, INCLUDING ALL APPLICABLE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION REGULATIONS AND ALL APPLICABLE PROVISIONS OF STATE LAW.(2) THE COLLECTION EVENT MUST BE OPERATED BY INDIVIDUALS PROPERLY TRAINED IN SAFE BATTERY COLLECTION, MANAGEMENT AND TRANSPORTATION.(3) THE COLLECTION EVENT MUST PROVIDE FOR THE COLLECTION OF ALL COVERED BATTERIES, INCLUDING ALL CHEMISTRIES AND BRANDS OF COVERED BATTERIES AND ALLOW ANY PERSON, BUSINESS, GOVERNMENT DEPARTMENT OR AGENCY OR NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION TO DELIVER ANY AMOUNT, CHEMISTRY AND BRAND OF COVERED BATTERY AT NO CHARGE.(4) THE PERSON OR RECYCLER MUST MAINTAIN AN INVENTORY OF ALL COVERED BATTERIES RECEIVED OR PLACED UNDER ITS CONTROL.(5) AT THE END OF THE COLLECTION EVENT, THE PERSON OR RECYCLER MUST RETURN THE COLLECTION SITE TO ITS ORIGINAL CONDITION, ENSURE THE SAFE AND ENVIRONMENTALLY SOUND TRANSPORT AND DELIVERY OF ALL COLLECTED BATTERIES FOR PROPER RECYCLING OR PROCESSING AND PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTIFICATION TO THE DEPARTMENT THAT CLEANUP HAS BEEN COMPLETED.(6) THE PERSON OR RECYCLER MUST ANNUALLY PROVIDE THE COLLECTION AND RECYCLING DATA TO THE DEPARTMENT BY MARCH 31 COVERING THE PRIOR CALENDAR YEAR. THE COLLECTION AND RECYCLING DATA SHALL INCLUDE THE INFORMATION CATEGORIES SPECIFIED FOR ALL BATTERIES COLLECTED BY THE PERSON OR RECYCLER IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B).(7) THE PERSON OR RECYCLER MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION FROM A BATTERY STEWARDSHIP ORGANIZATION FOR ANY BATTERIES 20250HB1233PN2600 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COLLECTED, TRANSPORTED OR RECYCLED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.Section 2. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1233PN2600 - 44 - 1234567